Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.644

Supervision by director—Certain acts prohibited.

During the period of supervisory direction, the director may prohibit the credit union from engaging in any of the following acts without prior approval:

(1) Disposing of, conveying, or encumbering any of its assets;

(2) Withdrawing any of its accounts at other financial institutions;

(3) Lending any of its funds;

(4) Investing any of its funds;

(5) Transferring any of its property; or

(6) Incurring any debt, obligation, or liability.

[ 1997 c 397 s 62.]